Utah statutes.
76-3-403.5.   Work or school release from county jail or facility -- Conditions.

When an inmate is incarcerated in a county jail or in a detention facility, the custodial authority may, in accordance with the release policy of the facility, allow the inmate to work outside of the jail or facility as part of a jail or facility supervised work detail, to seek or work at employment, or to attend an educational institution, if the inmate's incarceration:

(1)  is not for an offense for which release is prohibited under state law; and

(2) (a)  is for a misdemeanor offense, and the sentencing judge has not entered an order prohibiting release under this section; or

(b)  is part of a probation agreement for a felony offense, and the sentencing district judge has not entered an order prohibiting release under this section.



Amended by Chapter 148, 2007 General Session

